Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-950
Ballots to vote early; accepted, when; rejected ballots; how treated; storage.

Ballots issued under section 32-948 which are returned not later than the hour established for the closing of the polls shall be accepted for review by the counting board for early voting. Such ballots received by the election commissioner or county clerk after the close of the polls on election day shall remain sealed in the envelope on which the election commissioner or county clerk shall write Rejected, received on, and the date on which the ballot was received. If such a ballot was received on election day but after the close of the polls, the election commissioner or county clerk shall also write on the envelope the time at which the ballot was received. Such rejected ballots shall be segregated and stored in a sealed container designated for Rejected Early Ballots.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 293;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 97;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 13;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 51.